District of Columbia statutes.
31-3461

Compliance with federal health reform.

(a)

Sections 1251, 1252, and 1304 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, approved March 23, 2010 (124 Stat. 119; 42 U.S.C. §§ 18011, 18021, and 18024), and sections 2701 through 2709, 2711 through 2719A, and 2794 of the Public Health Service Act, approved July 1, 1944 (58 Stat. 682; 42 U.S.C. §§ 300gg, 300gg-1, 300gg-2, 300gg-3, 300gg-4, 300gg-5, 300gg-6, 300gg-7, 300gg-8, 300gg-9, 300gg-11, 300gg-12, 300gg-13, 300gg-14, 300gg-15, 300gg-15A, 300gg-16, 300gg-17, 300gg-18, 300gg-19, 300gg-19A, and 300gg-94), (collectively “federal health acts”) and any rules issued pursuant to the federal health acts are incorporated by reference and shall apply to all insurers, hospital and medical services corporations, and health maintenance organizations that deliver or issue for delivery individual or group health insurance policies or contracts in the District.

(b)

The Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities and Banking (“Commissioner”) has the authority to take action to enforce violations of subsection (a) of this section pursuant to the Commissioner’s authority under subchapter I of Chapter 1 of this title [§ 31-101 et seq.].

et seq.

(c)

The Commissioner, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this section.

May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-265, § 101, 62 DCR 1529